Hawaii statutes.
[§150A-56] Schedule of appropriations and
expenditures for program. (a) By January 1, 2009, the department shall
prepare a schedule of proposed annual appropriations for the biosecurity
program for the ensuing six fiscal years that represents the department's
realistic expectation as to the amounts necessary to effectively operate the
program, yet remain within the constraints of projected state revenue growth.

(b) By January 1 of each fiscal year
thereafter, the department shall update the schedule to include the following
information, as applicable, for the immediate past fiscal year, current fiscal
year, and ensuing five fiscal years:

(1) The proposed appropriations submitted or to be
submitted by the department to the governor for the biosecurity program;

(2) The proposed appropriations submitted or to be
submitted by the governor to the legislature in the executive or supplemental
budget;

(3) The actual appropriations by the legislature; and

(4) The actual expenditures.

(c) The department shall submit each required
schedule to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session of the legislature.

(d) The department may submit with each
schedule a narrative commenting on the effects of any variance between the
actual expenditure for the biosecurity program during a fiscal year and
proposed appropriation submitted by the department to the governor for that
fiscal year. [L 2008, c 236, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next